Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.121.070

Food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account.

(1) The food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. No appropriation is required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for moneys used for program administration.

(2) The university shall deposit into the account all moneys received for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship program, private contributions to the program, and receipts from participant repayments.

(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for conditional scholarships to participants in the program established by this chapter and costs associated with program administration by the university.

(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the authorization of the university.

[ 2008 c 208 s 8.]